Louisiana, session 2026, HB887.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2225.2.4(B)(5) through (7), (E)(1), and (F)(1), (2)(e), (3)(a) and
(4) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 38:2225.2.4(B)(8), (F)(7) through (9), and
(I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2225.2.4. Construction management at risk; public entity
* * *
B. When used in this Section, the following words and phrases have the
meanings ascribed to them in this Section, unless the context indicates a different
meaning:
* * *
(5) "Selection review committee" means the committee appointed by the
owner to review the request for qualifications, score, or rank of the proposers, and
recommend award to a construction management at risk contractor. The committee
shall consist of no more than five individuals appointed by the owner as follows:
(a) One design professional in the discipline of but not involved in the
project.
(b) One licensed contractor in the discipline of but not involved in the
project.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 887 ENROLLED
(c) One representative of the owner.
(d) Two members at large.
(a) One representative of the owner.
(b) One design professional in the relevant discipline not involved in the
project.
(c) One principal or employee of a licensed contractor in the relevant
discipline not involved in the project.
(d) Two members shall also be professionals in the relevant disciplines not
involved in the project, either design professionals or principals/employees of
licensed contractors.
(6) Proposal discussion, scoring and ranking of submitted proposals,
interviews, presentations, scoring and ranking following interviews and
presentations, and the publication of scores and recommendation by the selection
review committee to the owner may occur only at a meeting at which a quorum is
present. A quorum shall consist of the owner’s representative, at least one design
professional in the relevant discipline not involved in the project, and at least one
principal or employee of a licensed contractor in the relevant discipline not involved
in the project.
(6) (7) All other terms shall have the meanings as provided for in R.S.
38:2211.
(7) (8) All selection review committee members shall be required to sign an
ethics statement prior to commencement of any committee meeting.
* * *
E.(1) Prior to the selection review committee receiving and evaluating any
submitted proposals, and conducting business, the owner, the owner's representative,
or an assigned RFQ coordinator shall inform convene a public meeting held in
accordance with the Open Meetings Law to inform the committee on the RFQ, the
project, the scoring and ranking procedure, the conduct of the committee's
responsibility, and any particulars of the project.
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 887 ENROLLED
F.(1) A request for qualifications, or RFQ, to award a contract for a
construction management at risk contractor for preconstruction and construction
services shall be advertised in the official journal of the owner and, if one exists, on
the Internet website of the owner. The RFQ and shall be advertised at least two
times within the thirty-day period prior to the deadline for receipt of responses. The
RFQ shall also be advertised in the official journal of the state and posted on any
project notification and electronic bidding system utilized by the public entity.
(2) The RFQ shall include the following as well as any other pertinent
information limited to the qualifications of a proposer that the owner determines a
proposer may need to submit in a response to an RFQ:
* * *
(e) Total fees and compensation payable to the CMAR contractor for
preconstruction services, which shall be established by the owner and shall not be
requested from or offered by the proposers as part of their responses or interviews.
* * *
(3) The RFQ may request that proposers include the following in response
to the RFQ, as well as any other appropriate factors that would, in the opinion of the
owner, demonstrate the capability of the proposer to perform the role of CMAR
contractor:
(a) The proposer's surety. Audited financials shall not be required, as
production of a bonding commitment letter, dated within thirty days of the proposal
due date, for a payment and performance bond equivalent to the maximum estimated
project cost shall be sufficient to establish financial stability.
* * *
(4)(a) Within ninety days after the deadline for responses to the RFQ, a
selection review committee chosen by the owner and identified in the RFQ shall
make a written recommendation to the owner as to which proposer should be
awarded the contract. The results of the selection review committee, inclusive of its
findings, grading, score sheets, and recommendations, shall be available for review
by all proposers and shall be deemed public records. The exceptions to the Open
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 887 ENROLLED
Meetings Law are applicable to the selection review committee meetings where
individual proposers will be interviewed pursuant to R.S. 42:17(A)(10) R.S.
42:17(A)(11).
(b) Upon conclusion of all interviews or presentations, the selection review
committee shall enter into the executive session pursuant to R.S. 42:17(A)(11) for
the purpose of discussion. At the conclusion of such executive session, the selection
review committee shall reconvene in an open meeting, announce and publish each
proposer's scores, and identify the proposer it recommends for award to the owner.
* * *
(7)(a) The selection review committee shall apply the following scoring and
ranking procedures for all proposals:
(i) For submitted proposals, each selection review committee member shall
assign a ranking of first, second, or third for each section of the score sheet. For each
section of the score sheet, the following point values shall be assigned to each rank:
first place shall receive three points, second place shall receive two points, and third
place shall receive one point. The points assigned for each section shall then be
totaled to derive a total score for the top three proposals. Scoring shall be in
descending order, with the highest total score representing the best score.
(ii) After scoring and ranking the submitted proposals, the selection review
committee shall grant an in-person interview and presentation to the three proposers
whose proposals achieve the highest scores and meet the minimum criteria. If only
one or two proposers meet the minimum criteria, interviews shall be granted to all
such proposers.
(b) In the event that tied scores prevent a clear determination of the top three
proposers, the selection review committee shall consider the highest scoring
proposals and shall rank those proposals first, second, or third in order to eliminate
the tie.
(8)(a) The selection review committee shall require in-person interviews and
presentations from any proposer selected pursuant to Item (7)(a)(ii) of this
Subsection, except in the event of an emergency declared by the governor, force
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 887 ENROLLED
majeure, or other good cause, documented in writing by the owner, in which case
remote participation may be permitted.
(b) Following the completion of an interview and presentation, the selection
review committee shall complete a new score sheet form and shall consider both the
previously submitted proposal and the additional information provided during the
interview and presentation.
(c) The selection review committee shall apply the following scoring and
ranking procedures for interviews and presentations:
(i) Each member of the selection review committee shall assign a ranking of
first, second, or third to each proposer for each section of the score sheet. For each
section of the score sheet, first place shall receive three points, second place shall
receive two points, and third place shall receive one point. The points for each
section shall be totaled to determine a total score for each proposer. Proposers shall
then be ranked in descending order, with the highest total score representing the
highest ranking.
(ii) The proposer receiving the highest total on the score sheet shall be
recommended in writing to the owner by the selection review committee.
(iii) In the event that tied scores prevent a clear determination of the
successful proposer, the selection review committee shall consider both the
submitted proposals and the interviews and presentations and shall rank each
proposer first, second, or third to eliminate the tie.
(iv) The proposer with the most points after application of the procedures in
this Section shall be recommended in writing to the owner by the selection review
committee. The scoring determinations of the selection review committee shall be
final, except as provided in Subsection D of this Section.
(9) Neither the RFQ nor any response thereto, nor any interview or
presentation shall require, request, permit, or consider any proposer's proposed fee,
compensation, or general conditions amounts for preconstruction or construction
services prior to the selection of a construction management at risk contractor. The
selection review committee shall base its evaluation, scoring, ranking, and
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 887 ENROLLED
recommendation solely on qualifications and the evaluation factors set forth in the
RFQ, exclusive of any price, fee, or general conditions proposals, until a construction
management at risk contractor has been selected in accordance with this Section.
* * *
I. If any provision of this Section is determined to conflict with requirements
for grants obtained from federal funds, the remaining provisions of this Section shall
not be affected and only the conflicting provision shall be inapplicable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.